North Carolina, session 2025, SB850.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. RAISE SALARIES FOR TEACHERS AND INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT
PERSONNEL
SECTION 1.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers.
The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2026-2027 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 $5,000
1 $5,091
2 $5,183
3 $5,274
4 $5,366
5 $5,457
6 $5,576
7 $5,687
8 $5,796
9 $5,907
10 $6,018
*S850-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
11 $6,128
12 $6,239
13 $6,349
14 $6,460
15-24 $6,571
25+ $6,823
SECTION 1.(b) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule. –
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement each month of one hundred dollars
($100.00).
SECTION 1.(c) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
SECTION 1.(d) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
SECTION 1.(e) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule for
the 2026-2027 school year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
Page 2 Senate Bill 850-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 1.(f) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.
SECTION 1.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one billion six hundred seventy-five million dollars
($1,675,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase teacher
salaries in accordance with this section.

PART II. REINSTATE EDUCATION-BASED SALARY SUPPLEMENTS FOR
TEACHERS AND INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT PERSONNEL
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-302.10 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 2026-2027
fiscal year, State Board of Education policy TCP-A-006, as it was in effect on June 30, 2013,
shall be used to determine (i) whether teachers and instructional support personnel are paid on
the "M" salary schedule and (ii) whether they receive a salary supplement for academic
preparation at the six-year or doctoral degree level.
SECTION 2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to reinstate education-based salary supplements for teachers and
instructional support personnel in accordance with this section.

PART III. NORTH CAROLINA PAID STUDENT TEACHING GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.(a) Article 17D of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding the following new section to read:
"§ 115C-269.33. Paid Student Teaching Grant Program.
(a) Program; Purpose. – The State Board of Education, in coordination with approved
educator preparation programs, shall establish the Paid Student Teaching Grant Program
(Program). The purpose of the Program is to support teacher recruitment by providing financial
assistance to eligible student teachers during the student teaching portion of their enrollment in
an educator preparation program.
(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Eligible student teacher. – A student teacher who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is enrolled in an approved educator preparation program.
b. Is fulfilling the student teaching requirement of an educator
preparation program in a public school unit.
c. Has a demonstrated financial need according to criteria developed by
the Department of Public Instruction, including eligibility for the
federal Pell Grant.
d. Has not already received a grant under the Program.
(2) Recruitment public school unit. – A public school unit that employs a grant
recipient under the Program as a teacher.
(c) Selection. – The Department of Public Instruction, in coordination with approved
educator preparation programs, shall develop a process to accept applications from eligible
student teachers for the award grants under the Program. As part of the process, the Department
Senate Bill 850-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall verify the status of each applicant as a student teacher in a public school unit. To the extent
funds provided for grants pursuant to this section are insufficient to award grants to all eligible
student teachers, the Department may establish a lottery process for selection of grant recipients
in accordance with the requirements established by this section.
(d) Grant. – The Department shall award grants of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per year to eligible student teachers who meet the selection requirements established by the
Department pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. The Department shall allocate these funds
to student teachers on a monthly basis during their student teaching assignment.
(e) Recruitment Bonus. – The Department shall allocate funds to recruit public school
units each year to provide a one-time recruitment bonus of two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500) to grant recipients who accept employment in public school units. Notwithstanding
G.S. 135-1(7a), these bonuses are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the
General Statutes, Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees. Bonuses shall be
provided to persons who meet all of the following criteria:
(1) Received a grant under the Program.
(2) Graduated from an approved educator preparation program.
(3) Has been employed by the recruitment public school unit for at least 30 days.
(4) Has not previously received a recruitment bonus under this subsection.
(f) Report. – No later than April 15 of each year, the Department shall report to the Joint
Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the impact of the Program on teacher recruitment,
including at least the following information:
(1) The number of eligible student teachers receiving grants and the public school
units where they are completing their student teaching assignment.
(2) The eligible student teachers that did not receive grants because of insufficient
funding.
(3) Placement rates in public school units of eligible student teachers receiving
grants versus eligible student teachers who did not receive grants.
(4) Any other information the Department deems relevant to evaluation of the
effectiveness of the Program on teacher recruitment."
SECTION 3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in recurring funds to provide student teaching grants and recruitment bonuses for
teachers in accordance with the Paid Student Teaching Grant Program established under
G.S. 115C-269.33, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section.

PART IV. NORTH CAROLINA COLLABORATORY TO STUDY EDUCATOR
COMPENSATION
SECTION 4. No later than March 15, 2027, the North Carolina Collaboratory, in
consultation with the Department of Public Instruction, the Fiscal Research Division, and any
other relevant stakeholders, shall study and report on strategies to meaningfully increase educator
compensation in North Carolina over the next 10 years. The study shall evaluate policy options
for strengthening the educator workforce in North Carolina through competitive and sustainable
compensation structures and report on at least the following information:
(1) The competitiveness of educator salary schedules in North Carolina in
comparison to regional and national educator salary schedules.
(2) Strategies for long-term growth of educator salaries under the teacher salary
schedule.
(3) Compensation models recognizing career advancement, mentorship, and
instructional leadership.
(4) Incentives for high-need subject areas and high-need schools.
(5) Compensation strategies that improve educator retention.
Page 4 Senate Bill 850-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Sustainable funding approaches for strengthening educator compensation.
(7) Best practices from other states that have successfully and meaningfully
increased educator pay.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 850-First Edition Page 5